src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V2-BR-PastImp       ! Imperfect  - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite ( past hab.)
0:aíodh     NegQLen;
+1P+Sg:aínn     NegQLen;
+1P+Sg+Emph:aínnse      NegQLen;
+2P+Sg:aíteá        NegQLen;
!!!+3P+Sg:aíodh     NegQLen;
+1P+Pl:aímis        NegQLen;
+1P+Pl+Emph:aímisne     NegQLen;
!!!+2P+Pl:aíodh     NegQLen;
+3P+Pl:aídís        NegQLen;
+Auto:aítí      NegQLen;        

LEXICON V2-BR-Cond      ! Conditional Mood - Modh Coinníollach

0:ódh       #; ! munster variation
0:ódh       NegQLen;
+1P+Sg:óinn     NegQLen;
+1P+Sg+Emph:óinnse      NegQLen;
+1P+Sg:óinn     NegQLen;
+2P+Sg:ófá      NegQLen;
+2P+Sg+Emph:ófása       NegQLen;
!!!!+3P+Sg:ódh      NegQLen;
+1P+Pl:óimis        NegQLen;
+1P+Pl+Emph:óimisne     NegQLen;
!!!!+2P+Pl:ódh      NegQLen;
+3P+Pl:óidís        NegQLen;
+Auto:ófaí      NegQLen;        


LEXICON V2-BR-PresSubj      ! Present Subj. Mood - Modh Foshuiteach Láith.
0:aí        NegSubj;
+1P+Pl:aímid    NegSubj;
+1P+Pl+Emph:aímidne NegSubj;
+Auto:aítear    NegSubj;        

LEXICON V2-BR-PastSubj      ! Past Subjunctive Mood - Modh Foshuit. Caite

+1P+Sg:aínn NegQLen;
+1P+Sg+Emph:aínnse  NegQLen;
+2P+Sg:aíteá    NegQLen;
+3P+Sg:aíodh    NegQLen;
+1P+Pl:aímis    NegQLen;
+1P+Pl+Emph:aímisne NegQLen;
+2P+Pl:aíodh    NegQLen;
+3P+Pl:aídís    NegQLen;
+Auto:aítí  NegQLen;        

LEXICON V2-BR-Imper     ! Imperative Mood - Modh Ordaitheach

+1P+Sg:aím  NegImper;
+1P+Sg+Emph:aímse   NegImper;
+2P+Sg:^Fr  NegImper;
+3P+Sg:aíodh    NegImper;
+1P+Pl:aímis    NegImper;
+1P+Pl+Emph:aímisne NegImper;
+2P+Pl:aígí NegImper;
+3P+Pl:aídís    NegImper;
+Auto:aítear    NegImper;       


!***************************************************************************
!! inserted +Len +Uru to distinguish between a bhíonn & a mbíonn Dir/Indir
!! Rel clauses Dec 2004
!
!   CONTINUATION CLASSES COMMON TO VERBS 1 & 2
!***************************************************************************
!! inserted ^Verb (x5) in NegQ (EUD 14-10-2017)
LEXICON     NegQ
#;
+Len:^Verb^Sé    #;
+Neg+Len:^Verb^Sé    #;
+NegQ+Ecl:^Verb^Urú  #;
+Q+Ecl:^Verb^Urú     #;
+Ecl:^Verb^Urú       #;

! Copied from apertium-gle's most recent version (-ryan)
LEXICON		NegQ2
!! 
+Len:^Verb^Sé		#;
+Neg+Len:^Verb^Sé	#;
+Q+Ecl:^Verb^Urú	#;
+NegQ+Ecl:^Verb^Urú	#; ! added 9-2-05
+Ecl:^Verb^Urú		#; ! added 21-3-05 e.g. a mbíonn

! Copied from apertium-gle's most recent version (-ryan)
LEXICON		NegQIrreg
!! FORMS NOT LENITED IN POSITIVE PAST TENSE incl IMPERFECT
!!+Len:^Verb^Sé		#; ! e.g. dhúirt must be neg/negq etc unlike rug which is positive and uses NegQ2 
+Neg+Len:^Verb^Sé	#;
+Q+Ecl:^Verb^Urú	#;
+NegQ+Ecl:^Verb^Urú	#; ! added 9-2-05
+Ecl:^Verb^Urú		#; ! added 21-3-05 e.g. a mbíonn
#;			   ! e.g. dúirt

! Copied from apertium-gle's most recent version (-ryan)
LEXICON		SufNegQ
NegQ;
+Suf:s	NegQ;			!!! e.g. a bhíonns (may 2012 eud)

! Copied from apertium-gle's most recent version (-ryan)
LEXICON		NegQDep
+Neg+Len:^Verb^Sé	#;
+Q+Ecl:^Verb^Urú	#;
+NegQ+Ecl:^Verb^Urú	#; ! added 9-2-05
+Ecl:^Verb^Urú		#; ! added 21-3-05 e.g. a mbíonn


LEXICON     NegQPast
+Len:^Sé    #;
!!0:^Do     #;
+Neg+Len:^Sé    #;
+NegQ+Len:^Sé   #;
+Q+Len:^Sé  #;

LEXICON     NegQSaor
#;
+Neg:0      #;
+NegQ:0     #;
+Q:0        #;

LEXICON     NegQLen
+Len:^Sé    #;
!!0:^Do     #;
+Neg+Len:^Sé    #;
+NegQ+Len:^Sé   #;   !!!! is this correct - or should it be same as LEXICON NegQ ????
+Q+Ecl:^Urú #;  ! an mbriseann ?
+Ecl:^Urú   #;  ! a mbriseann &rl.

LEXICON     NegImper
        #;
+Neg:^hv    #;  ! ná hól

LEXICON     NegSubj
+Ecl:^Urú       #;
+Neg+Len:^Sé    #;

! DE-VERBAL NOUN & ADJS
! version 3 
! Nov 2005
! Elaine Ui Dhonnchadha
! Updated May 2008
!
! verbal nouns have vn lemma rather than verb lemma
! verbal noun gen is same as verbal adj except for new vns ending in -áil
! and some other e.g. úsáide, úsáidte 
!***********************************************************************
LEXICON	VN-INIT
#;
+Len:^IM^Sé	#;
+Ecl:^IM^Urú	#;
+hPref:^IM^hv	#;

LEXICON	VA-INIT
#;
+Len:^IM^Sé	#;

!***********************************************************************
! NO LONGER USED 05/2008

LEXICON VA-VNGEN
+Adj:0	#;
+Adj+Len:^IM^Sé		#;		! 1/9/06 testing
!+Adj:0		VN-INIT;
+Noun+Gen:0	VN-INIT;

LEXICON VA-VNGEN-ÁIL
!! áil -> Gen ála
+Adj:0	#;
+Adj+Len:^IM^Sé		#;		! 1/9/06 testing
!+Adj:0			VN-INIT;
+Noun+Gen:^áil^Verb	VN-INIT;
