src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VN-Variants
diongbháil+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:diongbhála		VN-INIT;
dligheachtáilte+Verbal+Adj:dligheachtáilte		VA-INIT;	! Headword: dligh (v.t. ); (Var: pres. ~, ~eann; vn. ~eachtáil f)
inghreamadh+Verbal+Noun+VT:inghreamadh		VN-INIT;	! Headword: inghreim (v.t. ); (Var: pres. inghreamann, vn. inghreamadh m)
siúndáilte+Verbal+Adj:siúndáilte		VA-INIT;
speacháil+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:speachála		VN-INIT;	! Headword: speach (v.t. & i. ); (Var: vn. ~áil f, ~aíl f)
LEXICON VNEqualVariants
conscairt+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:conscartha		VN-INIT;
feodhú+Verbal+Noun+VT+Len:feodhú		VN-INIT;
gobú+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Len:gobú		VN-INIT;
leabhradh+Verbal+Noun+VT:leabhradh		VN-INIT;
maoidheamh+Verbal+Noun+VTI:maoidheamh		VN-INIT;
mársáilte+Verbal+Adj:mársáilte	VA-INIT;
péacú+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:péacaithe		VN-INIT;
plionctha+Verbal+Adj:plionctha		VA-INIT;
rósadh+Verbal+Noun+VTI:rósadh		VN-INIT;
sordáil+Verbal+Noun+VTI:sordáil		VN-INIT;
stractha+Verbal+Adj:stractha		VA-INIT;
taltú+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:taltaithe		VN-INIT;
tóigeáil+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:tóigeála		VN-INIT;
ciarláilte+Verbal+Adj:ciarláilte		VA-INIT;
cnúdáil+Verbal+Noun+VI+Gen:cnúdála		VN-INIT;
íleáilte+Verbal+Adj:íleáilte		VA-INIT;
níonáil+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:níonála		VN-INIT;
strapáilte+Verbal+Adj:strapáilte		VA-INIT;
tuairgneáil+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:tuairgneála		VN-INIT;
iombhá+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:iomarbháite		VN-INIT;
LEXICON VNVA-FGB1
ascalú+Verbal+Noun+VI+Gen:ascalaithe	VN-INIT;	! GENITIVE
atéite+Verbal+Adj:atéite	VA-INIT;	! ADJECTIVE
breisiú+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:breisithe	VN-INIT;	! GENITIVE
carbraithe+Verbal+Adj:carbraithe	VA-INIT;	! ADJECTIVE
coilltiú+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:coilltithe	VN-INIT;	! GENITIVE
cúlghairithe+Verbal+Adj:cúlghairithe	VA-INIT;	! ADJECTIVE	***
diúscairt+Verbal+Noun+VT:diúscairt	VN-INIT;	! VERB::diúscair; Grammar::(gs -artha)
eadránaithe+Verbal+Adj:eadránaithe	VA-INIT;	! ADJECTIVE
fíniú+Verbal+Noun+VI:fíniú	VN-INIT;	! VERB::fínigh; Grammar::(gs -ithe)
foghlaithe+Verbal+Adj:foghlaithe	VA-INIT;	! ADJECTIVE
ginidithe+Verbal+Adj:ginidithe	VA-INIT;	! ADJECTIVE
indibhidiú+Verbal+Noun+VT:indibhidiú	VN-INIT;	! VERB::indibhidigh; Grammar::(gs -ithe)
leaschraolta+Verbal+Adj:leaschraolta	VA-INIT;	! ADJECTIVE
mionteagasctha+Verbal+Adj:mionteagasctha	VA-INIT;	! ADJECTIVE	***
príosúnú+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:príosúnaithe	VN-INIT;	! GENITIVE
sampláilte+Verbal+Adj:sampláilte	VA-INIT;	! ADJECTIVE
spaillte+Verbal+Adj:spaillte	VA-INIT;	! ADJECTIVE
trust+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:trusta	VN-INIT;	! GENITIVE
ársaithe+Verbal+Adj:ársaithe	VA-INIT;	! ADJECTIVE
caochfháithimithe+Verbal+Adj:caochfháithimithe	VA-INIT;	! ADJECTIVE
codhnú+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:codhnaithe	VN-INIT;	! GENITIVE
creimseáilte+Verbal+Adj:creimseáilte	VA-INIT;	! ADJECTIVE
feamnaithe+Verbal+Adj:feamnaithe	VA-INIT;	! ADJECTIVE
gormú+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:gormaithe	VN-INIT;	! GENITIVE
lastáilte+Verbal+Adj:lastáilte	VA-INIT;	! ADJECTIVE
púitseáilte+Verbal+Adj:púitseáilte	VA-INIT;	! ADJECTIVE
saibhseáil+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:saibhseála	VN-INIT;	! GENITIVE
scuitseáilte+Verbal+Adj:scuitseáilte	VA-INIT;	! ADJECTIVE
stoithinte+Verbal+Adj:stoithinte	VA-INIT;	! ADJECTIVE
tatuáil+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:tatuála	VN-INIT;	! GENITIVE
torchartha+Verbal+Adj:torchartha	VA-INIT;	! ADJECTIVE
LEXICON VerbalAdjs
adamhaithe+Verbal+Adj:adamhaithe	VA-INIT;
ailínithe+Verbal+Adj:ailínithe	VA-INIT;
aistrithe+Verbal+Adj:aistrithe	VA-INIT;
ansmachtaithe+Verbal+Adj:ansmachtaithe	VA-INIT;
ataite+Verbal+Adj:ataite	VA-INIT;	! ??? (v=aitim)
athnuaite+Verbal+Adj:athnuaite		VA-INIT; ! ADJECTIVE
baigthe+Verbal+Adj:baigthe	VA-INIT;
bladartha+Verbal+Adj:bladartha	VA-INIT;
breithnithe+Verbal+Adj:breithnithe	VA-INIT;
cactha+Verbal+Adj:cactha	VA-INIT;
casaoide+Verbal+Adj:casaoide		VA-INIT; ! ADJECTIVE
ciorraithe+Verbal+Adj:ciorraithe	VA-INIT;
clutharaithe+Verbal+Adj:clutharaithe	VA-INIT;
coinnithe+Verbal+Adj:coinnithe	VA-INIT;
comhoiriúnaithe+Verbal+Adj:comhoiriúnaithe	VA-INIT;
craobhscaoilte+Verbal+Adj:craobhscaoilte	VA-INIT;
crúite+Verbal+Adj:crúite	VA-INIT;
cúrsáilte+Verbal+Adj:cúrsáilte	VA-INIT;
déileáilte+Verbal+Adj:déileáilte	VA-INIT;
dífe+Verbal+Adj:dífe	VA-INIT;
diosctha+Verbal+Adj:diosctha	VA-INIT;
dréachtaithe+Verbal+Adj:dréachtaithe	VA-INIT;
éartha+Verbal+Adj:éartha	VA-INIT;
fáiltithe+Verbal+Adj:fáiltithe	VA-INIT;
fíneáilte+Verbal+Adj:fíneáilte	VA-INIT;
fréamhaithe+Verbal+Adj:fréamhaithe	VA-INIT;
geallearbtha+Verbal+Adj:geallearbtha	VA-INIT;
gnáthaithe+Verbal+Adj:gnáthaithe	VA-INIT;
gríosaithe+Verbal+Adj:gríosaithe	VA-INIT;
infhillte+Verbal+Adj:infhillte	VA-INIT;
iontaisithe+Verbal+Adj:iontaisithe	VA-INIT;
leáite+Verbal+Adj:leáite	VA-INIT;
liúite+Verbal+Adj:liúite	VA-INIT;
martha+Verbal+Adj:martha		VA-INIT; ! ADJECTIVE
meirbhlithe+Verbal+Adj:meirbhlithe	VA-INIT;
múnta+Verbal+Adj:múnta	VA-INIT;
olltáirgthe+Verbal+Adj:olltáirgthe	VA-INIT;
píobtha+Verbal+Adj:píobtha	VA-INIT;
pollta+Verbal+Adj:pollta	VA-INIT;
ransaithe+Verbal+Adj:ransaithe	VA-INIT;
roctha+Verbal+Adj:roctha	VA-INIT;
sáithithe+Verbal+Adj:sáithithe	VA-INIT;
sceimhlithe+Verbal+Adj:sceimhlithe	VA-INIT;
scríofa+Verbal+Adj:scríofa	VA-INIT;
sindeacáitithe+Verbal+Adj:sindeacáitithe	VA-INIT;
sloinnte+Verbal+Adj:sloinnte	VA-INIT;
soirbhithe+Verbal+Adj:soirbhithe	VA-INIT;
sraoillte+Verbal+Adj:sraoillte	VA-INIT;
stoptha+Verbal+Adj:stoptha	VA-INIT;
tairbhithe+Verbal+Adj:tairbhithe	VA-INIT;
téaltaithe+Verbal+Adj:téaltaithe	VA-INIT;
tnáite+Verbal+Adj:tnáite	VA-INIT;
tráchta+Verbal+Adj:tráchta	VA-INIT;
tugtha+Verbal+Adj:tugtha	VA-INIT;
vástáilte+Verbal+Adj:vástáilte	VA-INIT;
LEXICON VerbalNouns
aireachtaint+Verbal+Noun+VTI:aireachtaint	VN-INIT;
bachlú+Verbal+Noun+VI:bachlú	VN-INIT;
breo+Verbal+Noun+VTI:breo	VN-INIT;
canadh+Verbal+Noun+VTI:canadh	VN-INIT;
cluinstin+Verbal+Noun+VTI:cluinstean	VN-INIT;
comhordú+Verbal+Noun+VT:comhordú	VN-INIT;
críochnú+Verbal+Noun+VTI:críochnú	VN-INIT;
damnú+Verbal+Noun+VT:damnú	VN-INIT;
dumpáil+Verbal+Noun+VT:dumpáil	VN-INIT;
eitilt+Verbal+Noun+VI:eitilt	VN-INIT;
freastalú+Verbal+Noun+NStem:freastalú	VN-INIT;
glaoch+Verbal+Noun+VTI:glaoch	VN-INIT;
iarnáil+Verbal+Noun+VT:iarnáil	VN-INIT;
leachtú+Verbal+Noun+VTI:leachtú	VN-INIT;
léasadh+Verbal+Noun+VT:léasadh	VN-INIT;
mothú+Verbal+Noun+VTI:mothú	VN-INIT;
parsáil+Verbal+Noun+VT:parsáil	VN-INIT;
píceáil+Verbal+Noun+VTI:píceáil	VN-INIT;
ríomhadh+Verbal+Noun+VT:ríomhadh	VN-INIT;
scriosadh+Verbal+Noun+VTI:scriosadh	VN-INIT;
smachtú+Verbal+Noun+VT:smachtú	VN-INIT;
srathú+Verbal+Noun+VTI:srathú	VN-INIT;
síneadh+Verbal+Noun+VTI:síneadh	VN-INIT;
ticeáil+Verbal+Noun+VTI:ticeáil	VN-INIT;
troiscadh+Verbal+Noun+VI:troiscadh	VN-INIT;
áireamh+Verbal+Noun+VT:áireamh	VN-INIT;
LEXICON VerbalNounsGen
aireachtáil+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:aireachtála		VN-INIT;	! ***
atitim+Verbal+Noun+VI+Gen:atitime		VN-INIT;	! ***
bréagadh+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:bréagtha		VN-INIT;
carnadh+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:carntha		VN-INIT;
cnagadh+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:cnagtha		VN-INIT;
corónú+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:corónaithe		VN-INIT;
cumadh+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:cumtha		VN-INIT;
díol+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:díolta		VN-INIT; ! ***
eangú+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:eangaithe		VN-INIT;
fionnadh+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:fionnta		VN-INIT;
géimneach+Verbal+Noun+VI+Gen:géimní		VN-INIT; ! ***
iamh+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:iata		VN-INIT;
lamháil+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:lamhála		VN-INIT;
lua+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:luaite		VN-INIT;
modhnú+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:modhnaithe		VN-INIT;
parsáil+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:parsála		VN-INIT;
rá+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:ráite		VN-INIT; ! ***
sáinniú+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:sáinnithe		VN-INIT;
scriosadh+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:scriosta		VN-INIT;
smailceadh+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:smailcthe		VN-INIT;
sroicheadh+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:sroichte		VN-INIT;
taithí+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:taithí		VN-INIT;
toilleadh+Verbal+Noun+VI+Gen:toillte		VN-INIT;
uimhriú+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:uimhrithe		VN-INIT;
craitheadh+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:craite		VN-INIT;
rothú+Verbal+Noun+VI+Gen:rothaithe		VN-INIT;
